District of Columbia statutes.
50-1218

Electronic creation, recordation, and transfer of liens.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, the Director may receive and transmit liens and lien information electronically, record liens electronically, and create and transfer titles electronically, in accordance with the following provisions:

(1)

Any lien information pursuant to § 50-1206 or § 50-1208 transmitted electronically shall be transmitted by the lienholder and need not include a signature.

(2)

Electronic lien recordation notices shall include the information required by § 50-1204(a)(2).

(3)

An electronic lien satisfaction notice shall include the name, address, telephone number, and driver’s license number or special identification card number, if known, and social security number, if known, of the person satisfying the lien, but need not include a signature.

(4)

When a lien is transmitted electronically or a title is created electronically, a paper certificate of title shall be issued only after all liens are satisfied and only upon request by the owner.

(5)

When a vehicle is subject to an electronic lien, the certificate of title for the vehicle shall be considered to be held by the lienholder.

(6)

All taxes and fees associated with the issuance of certificates of title and the recordation of liens shall be collected for the electronic versions.

(b)

A duly certified copy of the Director’s electronic record of a title or lien shall be admissible in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding as evidence of ownership.

July 2, 1940, ch. 527, § 15b
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 201(k), 54 DCR 903